Hawaii statutes.
§147-54 Department, consideration of use.
The factors required to be considered by the department of agriculture in
establishing any grades, standards, or classifications for any food product
shall be applied in accordance with the extent to which and manner in which the
same relate to the quality and condition of that product and the value and
suitability thereof for the commercial or other use to which it is normally
put. [L 1947, c 195, §4; RL 1955, §22-43; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961,
c 132, §2; HRS §147-54]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next